North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-08 Lieutenant Governor

54-08-01.
Duties of lieutenant governor.

The duties of the lieutenant governor are those prescribed in the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 87; R.C. 1899, § 87; R.C. 1905, § 90; C.L. 1913, § 118; R.C. 1943, § 54-0801.

Cross-References.

Duties, see N.D. Const., Art. V, §§ 11, 12.

Election, see N.D. Const., Art. V, § 3.

Qualifications, see N.D. Const., Art. V, § 4.

54-08-02.
Disability of lieutenant governor — Who shall act.

In case of the death, impeachment, resignation, failure to qualify, absence from the state, removal from office, or the disability of the lieutenant governor, the powers and duties of that office for the residue of the term, or until the lieutenant governor is acquitted or the disability removed, shall devolve upon the president pro tempore of the senate, except that the president pro tempore of the senate does not succeed to the office of governor by virtue of having the powers and duties of the office of lieutenant governor. When presiding over any meeting of the senate, all the powers and duties of the office of lieutenant governor shall devolve upon the president pro tempore of the senate.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 84, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 89; R.C. 1899, § 89; R.C. 1905, § 92; C.L. 1913, § 120; R.C. 1943, § 54-0802.

54-08-03.
Salary of lieutenant governor.

The annual salary of the lieutenant governor is one hundred nine thousand five hundred thirty-six dollars through June 30, 2022, and one hundred eleven thousand seven hundred twenty-seven dollars thereafter.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 93, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 88; R.C. 1899, § 88; R.C. 1905, § 91; C.L. 1913, § 119; I.M. Nov. 8, 1932, § 1, S.L. 1933, p. 504; 1943, ch. 202, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 54-0803; S.L. 1957, ch. 335, § 10; 1957 Supp., § 54-0803; S.L. 1965, ch. 344, § 6; 1973, ch. 417, § 6; 1977, ch. 480, § 7; 1983, ch. 44, § 17; 1985, ch. 560, § 6; 1989, ch. 1, § 22; 1991, ch. 28, § 31; 1991, ch. 53, § 11; 1995, ch. 23, § 4; 1997, ch. 1, § 4; 1999, ch. 23, § 4; ch. 29, ch. 1, § 4; 2005, ch. 1, § 6; 2007, ch. 28, § 7; 2009, ch. 1, § 5; 2011, ch. 27, § 6; 2013, ch. 1, § 6; 2015, ch. 35, § 5, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 26, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 1, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 35, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 1, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-08-04.
Salary of lieutenant governor when acting for governor.

When the lieutenant governor acts as governor, the lieutenant governor is entitled to receive during the time the lieutenant governor so acts the compensation which the governor, if acting, would be entitled to receive for such time. During such time the lieutenant governor is not entitled as lieutenant governor to any other compensation.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 93, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 88; R.C. 1899, § 88; R.C. 1905, § 91; C.L. 1913, § 119; R.C. 1943, § 54-0804.